Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-1116
Violations; injunction; receiver; appointment; additional court orders authorized.

Whenever it appears to the director that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of the Securities Act of Nebraska or any rule and regulation or order under the act, the director may in his or her discretion bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any such acts or practices and to enforce compliance with the Securities Act of Nebraska or any rule and regulation or order under the act. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandamus shall be granted and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant's assets. Upon a proper showing by the director, the court may invoke its equitable powers under the law and issue an order of rescission, restitution, or disgorgement, an order freezing assets, an order requiring an accounting, or a writ of attachment or writ of general or specific execution, directed to any person who has engaged in or is engaging in any act constituting a violation of any provision of the Securities Act of Nebraska or any rule and regulation or order under the act. Neither the director nor any receiver appointed pursuant to this section shall be required to post a bond.

Laws 1965, c. 549, § 16, p. 1792;

Laws 1998, LB 894, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB113, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB148, § 15;

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 47.